Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB468.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 67UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEMSSubchapterA. Interstate Agreements for Research and DeploymentB. (Reserved)SUBCHAPTER AINTERSTATE AGREEMENTS FOR RESEARCH AND DEPLOYMENTSec.6701. Definitions.6702. Interstate agreements.§ 6701. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718 The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Educational partner." A school entity or an institution of higher education."Institution of higher education." As defined in section 1501-L of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."School entity." A public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school, operating within this Commonwealth."Unmanned aircraft system" or "UAS." An aircraft operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft.§ 6702. Interstate agreements.(a) Agreements authorized.--The department, on behalf of the Commonwealth, may negotiate one or more interstate agreements with an agency or educational partner recognized by the Federal Aviation Administration for the research, testing, deployment, training or education of unmanned aircraft systems.(b) Approval required.--The Governor shall approve or disapprove each agreement negotiated by the department under subsection (a). An agreement shall become effective upon approval by the Governor.(c) Administration of agreement.--Following approval under subsection (b), the department shall approve at least one entity to administer the research, testing and deployment of, and 20250SB0468PN0893 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 training or education or use of, a UAS on behalf of the department. To be approved, an entity must be:(1) located on or near an airport in this Commonwealth; or(2) an educational partner that offers aviation courses.(d) Location.--An interstate agreement shall operate in:(1) A county of the fourth class with a population between 133,000 and 134,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(2) A county of the sixth class with a population between 74,000 and 75,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(3) Any other county in this Commonwealth as approved by the department.(e) Operation of UAS.--A UAS may operate under this subchapter in this Commonwealth only if the UAS is:(1) operated by a party to an interstate agreement entered into under this section or otherwise authorized by a party or the department consistent with an interstate agreement entered into under this section; and(2) authorized to operate and is operating in compliance with all Federal, State or local APPLICABLE laws, regulations and guidelines.(f) Regulations.--(1) The department may promulgate temporary regulations to implement this subchapter that shall expire no later than three years after publication or upon promulgation of final-form regulations, whichever is earlier. The temporary regulations shall not be subject to the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 20250SB0468PN0893 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall expire three years after the effective date of this paragraph.(g) Publication of interstate agreements.--The department shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin when an interstate agreement under this section is entered into and becomes effective.SUBCHAPTER B(Reserved)Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0468PN0893 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021